District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.13

Fees; Professional Engineers’ Fund; expenses of Board; audit.

(a)

Each application for registration as a professional engineer shall be accompanied by the appropriate prescribed application fee and the registration fee. A person desiring certification as an engineer-in-training shall pay the prescribed application fee for such certification with his application and shall pay the additional application fee and the registration fee upon filing his application for registration as a professional engineer.

(b)

Should the Board deny the issuance of a certificate of registration to any applicant, the registration fee deposited with the application shall be refunded.

(c)

The amount of the fees prescribed in this part is that fixed by the following schedule:

(1)

The application fee for professional engineer with 1st and 2nd-stage examination is $20;

(2)

The application fee for professional engineer without examination is $10;

(3)

The application fee for engineer-in-training with examination is $7.50;

(4)

The application fee for engineer-in-training without examination is $5;

(5)

The application fee for professional engineer with 2nd-stage examination is $12.50;

(6)

The fee for reexamination shall be determined by the Board not to exceed $10;

(7)

The registration fee for professional engineer is $5;

(8)

The biennial registration renewal fee for professional engineer is $6;

(9)

The fee for reissuance of a revoked certificate of engineer-in-training is $7.50;

(10)

The fee for reissuance of a revoked registration certificate is $20;

(11)

The fee for issuance of a duplicate certificate of registration is $5; and

(12)

The penalty for delinquence is $1 for each month after the date upon which the biennial renewal fee became due; provided, however, that the total shall not exceed $4.

(d)

The Secretary-Treasurer of the Board shall receive and account for all money derived from the provisions of this part and shall keep such money in a separate fund to be known as “Professional Engineers’ Fund,” such Fund to be disbursed only by the Secretary-Treasurer upon itemized vouchers approved by the Chairman and attested by the Secretary-Treasurer of the Board. The Secretary-Treasurer shall furnish bond for the faithful discharge of his duties, in such form and amount as the Council of the District of Columbia shall require. The premium on such bond shall be regarded as a proper and necessary expense of the Board. The Secretary-Treasurer of the Board shall receive such salary as the Mayor shall determine, in addition to the compensation provided for in § 47-2886.06 [omitted]. The Board may make expenditures from this Fund for any purpose which, in the opinion of the Board, is reasonably necessary for the proper performance of its duties under this part; provided, however, that such expenditures shall in no event exceed the total of receipts. For the purpose of any contemplated investigation or audit by the Inspector General, the Office of the Inspector General shall have free access to the books of account, records, and papers of the Board.

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 864, ch. 953, § 13
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1063(a), 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
Licensing and registration fees, see § 1-301.74.
This section is referenced in § 1-301.74.
1981 Ed., § 2-2313.
1973 Ed., § 2-1813.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (d), substituted “For the purpose of any contemplated investigation or audit by the Inspector General,” for “It shall be the duty of the Office of the Inspector General of the District of Columbia to audit annually the accounts of the Board and make a report thereof to the Mayor. For the purpose of performance of such duty”.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
Board of Registration for Professional Engineers abolished: See note to § 47-2886.05.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(69) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.